Utah statutes.
63K-1-602.   Official acts at emergency seat of government -- Validity.

During the time when the seat of government remains at an emergency location, all official acts required by law to be performed at the seat of government by any officer, agency, department, or authority of this state or local government, including the convening and meeting of the Legislature in regular, extraordinary, or emergency session, shall be as valid and binding as when performed at the normal location of the seat of government.

